test/src/morphology/N-angwrz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aņgõrz: # Noun 229 'eng /est angerjas/fin' - full paradigm
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Nom: aņgõrz
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Gen: aņgõr
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Par: aņgõrzt
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Dat: aņgõrõn
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Ins: aņgõrõks
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Ill: aņgõrõ
     aņgõrz+N+Sg+Ela: aņgõrõst
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Nom: aņgõrd
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Gen: aņgõrd
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Par: aņgiri
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Dat: aņgõrdõn
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Ins: aņgõrdõks
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Ill: aņgiriž
     aņgõrz+N+Pl+Ela: aņgirist
